California, session 20252026, SB1100.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 933 of the Penal Code is amended to read:933. (a) Each grand jury shall submit to the presiding judge of the superior court a final report of its findings and recommendations that pertain to county government matters during the fiscal or calendar year. term. Final reports on any appropriate subject may be submitted to the presiding judge of the superior court at any time during the term of service of a grand jury. A final report may be submitted for comment to responsible officers, agencies, or departments, including the county board of supervisors, when applicable, upon finding of the presiding judge that the report is in compliance with this title. For 45 days after the end of the term, the foreperson and his or her their designees shall, upon reasonable notice, be available to clarify the recommendations of the report.(b) (1) One copy of each final report, together with the responses thereto, responses found to be in compliance with this title title, shall be placed on file with the clerk of the court and remain on file in the office of the clerk. The clerk shall immediately forward a true copy of the report and the responses to the State Archivist who shall retain that report and all responses in perpetuity.(2) The clerk of the court shall compile all final reports and the responses to the reports generated during the grand jury’s term of service. Once a year, within six months of the end of the grand jury’s term of service, the clerk shall transmit, in a single transfer, a complete set of true copies of all final reports and the responses to the reports to the State Archivist who shall retain all final reports and responses in perpetuity.(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not be construed under any circumstances as requiring the clerk of the court to create new or consolidated documents.(c) No later than 90 days after the grand jury submits a final report on the operations of any public agency subject to its reviewing authority, the governing body of the public agency shall comment to the presiding judge of the superior court on the findings and recommendations pertaining to matters under the control of the governing body, and every elected county officer or agency head for which the grand jury has responsibility pursuant to Section 914.1 shall comment within 60 days to the presiding judge of the superior court, with an information copy sent to the board of supervisors, on the findings and recommendations pertaining to matters under the control of that county officer or agency head and any agency or agencies which that officer or agency head supervises or controls. In any city and county, the mayor shall also comment on the findings and recommendations. All of these comments and reports shall forthwith be submitted to the presiding judge of the superior court who impaneled the grand jury. A copy of all responses to grand jury reports shall be placed on file with the clerk of the public agency and the office of the county clerk, or the mayor when applicable, and shall remain on file in those offices. One copy shall be placed on file with the applicable grand jury final report by, and in the control of the currently impaneled grand jury, where it shall be maintained for a minimum of five years.(d) As used in this section “agency” includes a department.